test/src/morphology/V-tohtiit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tohtiit - ok: # Verb 'to bring' - 
     tohtiit+V+Inf: tohtiit
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tohđin
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tohđit
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tohtii
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tohđima
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tohđitta
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tohđithaan
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tohđin
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tohđit
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tohti
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tohđima
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tohđitta
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tohđithiin
     tohtiit+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tohtinu
     tohtiit+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: tohđittu
     tohtiit+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tohtinheet
     tohtiit+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tohtiiva
     tohtiit+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tohtiivat
     tohtiit+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tohđittava
     tohtiit+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tohđittavat

     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: tohtisin
     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: tohtisit
     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tohtis
     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: tohtisimma
     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: tohtisitta
     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: tohđittais
     tohtiit+V+Pass+Cond: tohđittais

     tohtiit+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: tohđi
     tohtiit+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: tohtikkaa
     
     tohtiit+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: tohtimassa
     tohtiit+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: tohtimasta
     tohtiit+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: tohtimhaan
     tohtiit+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: tohtimalla
     tohtiit+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: tohtimatta
